Hawaii statutes.
[§806D-5] Recipients' immunity from liability. A
recipient of criminal process under this chapter, and any other person that
responds to such process is immune from civil and criminal liability for
complying with the process, and for any failure to provide notice of any
disclosure to the person who is the subject of or identified in the disclosure.
[L 2012, c 325, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next